Hawaii statutes.
[CHAPTER
481A]

UNIFORM
DECEPTIVE TRADE PRACTICE ACT

Section

481A-1 Title

481A-2 Definitions

481A-3 Deceptive trade practices

481A-4 Remedies

481A-5 Application

Law Journals and Reviews

On relationship of this chapter to §480-2, see Misrepresentation
and Deception Under Section 480-2 of the Hawaii Revised Statutes. 10 HBJ 69.

What Can the Abolition of Slavery Teach Us About Climate
Change? Local Action in the Liquefied Natural Gas Controversy. 35 UH L. Rev.
687 (2013).

Case Notes

Plaintiffs' unfair or deceptive acts and practices claim, in
violation of this section, based on the recording of an allegedly false
assignment failed where plaintiffs failed to establish that the assignment was
false; moreover, contrary to plaintiffs' contention, the express terms of the
mortgage and the assignment in question suggest that one named defendant only
transferred to other named defendant its "'right to foreclose and sell the
[p]roperty'". 823 F. Supp. 2d 1061.

Under the filed-rate doctrine, telephone customers' claims
failed as a matter of law where customers could not demonstrate that telephone
company's allegedly inadequate disclosures constituted an unfair or deceptive
trade practice because (1) company's tariffs on file with the public utilities
commission disclosed that fees should be assessed against customers receiving
touch calling services; (2) knowledge of these disclosures contained in the
tariff was imputed to the customers, and, thus, (3) customers could prove
neither the injury nor the likelihood of damage that is required under §480-2
or this chapter. 109 H. 69, 123 P.3d 194.

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next